Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2423.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 15-708, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-708. Mathematics proficiency; parental notification; advanced mathematics courses; reporting requirements A. If the statewide assessment results are available before the start of each school year, each school district and charter school shall provide notification no not later than the first half of the second quarter of the school year to parents of pupils in grades six through eight who have not demonstrated proficiency in grade-level mathematics based on available local or statewide assessments. The notification shall must include the following information: 1. A description of the pupil's mathematics deficiencies as demonstrated by the statewide assessment. 2. A description of the current mathematics services provided by the school district or charter school, including supplemental instructional services and supporting programs that are designed to remediate mathematics deficiencies. B. Each school district and charter school shall: 1. Enroll a student who is in sixth, seventh or eighth grade in an advanced mathematics course, IF AVAILABLE, for the next mathematics course in which the student enrolls if the student's parent does not object and the student meets at least one of the following: (a) Demonstrates the highest proficiency in grade-level mathematics on the statewide assessment. (b) Demonstrates the highest proficiency in grade-level mathematics on a benchmark assessment that is aligned to the statewide assessment and administered by the school district or charter school or by the school in which the student was enrolled in the immediately preceding school year. 2. On enrollment pursuant to paragraph 1 of this subsection, provide notification to the student's parent that includes both of the following: (a) The purpose and goals of the automatic enrollment in an advanced mathematics course. (b) Instructions on how the parent may object to the automatic enrollment in an advanced mathematics course. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 4, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 5, 2026.